Utah statutes.
23-23-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Cooperative wildlife management unit" or "unit" means a generally contiguous area of land open for hunting small game, waterfowl, cougar, turkey, or big game which is registered in accordance with this chapter and rules of the Wildlife Board.

(2) (a)  "Cooperative wildlife management unit agent" means a person appointed by a landowner, landowner association, or landowner association operator to perform the functions described in Section 23-23-9.

(b)  For purposes of this chapter, a cooperative wildlife management unit agent may not:

(i)  be appointed by the division or the state;

(ii)  be an employee or agent of the division;

(iii)  receive compensation from the division or the state to act as a cooperative wildlife management unit agent; or

(iv)  act as a peace officer or perform any duties of a peace officer without qualifying as a peace officer under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications.

(3)  "Cooperative wildlife management unit authorization" means a card, label, ticket, or other identifying document authorizing the possessor to hunt small game or waterfowl in a cooperative wildlife management unit.

(4)  "Cooperative wildlife management unit permit" means a permit authorizing the possessor to hunt cougar, turkey, or big game in a cooperative wildlife management unit.

(5)  "Division" means the Division of Wildlife Resources.

(6)  "Landowner association" means a landowner or an organization of owners of private lands who operates a cooperative wildlife management unit.

(7) (a)  "Landowner association operator" means a person designated by a landowner association to operate the cooperative wildlife management unit.

(b)  For purposes of this chapter, a landowner association operator may not:

(i)  be appointed by the division; or

(ii)  be an employee or agent of the division.

